North Dakota, session 69, HB1491.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15.1-06 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
High school sports and activities - Eligibility - Residence within a school district.
1. For purposes of student eligibility for high school sports and activities, the North
Dakota high school activities association shall presume no recruitment or undue
influence has occurred.
2. A parent or guardian of a student may verify the student's residence is in the school
district by providing the North Dakota high school activities association with a current
utility bill, financial statement, mortgage, lease, or rental document, government-
issued property tax statement, or government-issued identification card.
3. The North Dakota high school activities association may not require evidence of the
parent or guardian having vacated the parent's or guardian's previous residence.
4. A student who has a parent or guardian with joint custody of the student, who moves
from the residence of one parent or guardian to another parent or guardian is a
resident of the receiving school district and eligible to participate in sports and
activities upon enrollment at the receiving school district. The North Dakota high
school activities association may not delay eligibility or limit eligibility based on the
number of times a student moves and transfers to a different school district.
Page No. 1 25.1074.02000